Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-573
Council; report.

The Geographic Information Systems Council shall provide a report of its activities to the Nebraska Information Technology Commission for inclusion in the biannual progress report submitted to the Governor and the Legislature by the commission pursuant to section 86-518.

Laws 1991, LB 639, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 50;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 81-2605;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 343;

Laws 2008, LB823, § 21.